test/src/morphology/A-aainagi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - āinagi: # adjectives 199 'eng /est ainuke/fin' - full paradigm
     āinagi+A+Sg+Nom: āinagi
     āinagi+A+Sg+Gen: āinagiz
     āinagi+A+Sg+Par: āinagizt
     āinagi+A+Sg+Dat: āinagizõn
     āinagi+A+Sg+Ins: āinagizõks
     āinagi+A+Sg+Ill: āinagizõ
     āinagi+A+Sg+Ela: āinagizõst
     āinagi+A+Pl+Nom: āinagizt
     āinagi+A+Pl+Gen: āinagizt
     āinagi+A+Pl+Par: āinagiži
     āinagi+A+Pl+Dat: āinagiztõn
     āinagi+A+Pl+Ins: āinagiztõks
     āinagi+A+Pl+Ill: āinagižiz
     āinagi+A+Pl+Ela: āinagižist
